North Dakota, session 69, HB1510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-18.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is
created and enacted as follows:
New teacher resource - Financial planning.
1. The Bank of North Dakota and teachers' fund for retirement board shall submit to the
superintendent of public instruction, in the manner prescribed by the superintendent of
public instruction:
a. Information on the framework of a teacher salary matrix ;
b. Comparisons between insurance plans available for teachers;
c. Description of benefits in teacher contracts; and
d. Information about Internal Revenue Code section 457 deferred compensation
plans, teachers' fund for retirement plans, and other benefits available to
teachers.
2. The superintendent of public instruction shall compile the information under
subsection 1 into a report and distribute the report to the teacher preparation
programs, administrators , including superintendents, business managers, and building
Page No. 1 25.1177.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
principals, and school districts for the benefit of educating new and recently hired
teachers.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 50-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
On-site child care for kindergarten through grade twelve teachers - Rules.
1. A school district may provide child care services or allow child care providers to
provide child care services for the children of teachers in a building located on school
premises.
2. The department, in cooperation with education stakeholders invited by the department,
shall review and revise rules under chapter 28 - 32 to implement this section by July 1 ,
2026.
SECTION 3. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - HEALTH INSURANCE POOL FOR
SCHOOL DISTRICT EMPLOYEES. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management
shall consider studying the feasibility of, impact of, and process for creating a health insurance
pool for school district employees. The study must include a cost-benefit analysis of
implementing a health insurance pool, a review of health insurance pool plan designs and
administrative structures, and a comparative analysis of similar approaches adopted by other
states for school district employees. The study also must include an analysis of the impact a
health insurance pool would have on teacher salaries and a review of compensation structures
that maximize lifetime earnings. The legislative management shall report its findings and
recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to
the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - TEACHER
RETENTION PROGRAM. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the foundation aid
stabilization fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $2,000,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of
providing a statewide teacher retention program to support district leaders, including building
principals and classroom teachers, to improve employee satisfaction and work environments,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - TEACHER
SUPPORT. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury,
Page No. 2 25.1177.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $2,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of providing funding for the
teacher support program operated by the education standards and practices board, including
supports and resources for all first, second, and third year teachers, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 3 25.1177.02000